Massachusetts, session 194th, H2773.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 32 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is amended in Section 1 by adding after the definition of "Pension Reserve Fund" the following 
definition:- "Person", any person, individual or corporation; retirement board or member of a 
retirement board; or, organization of retirement board members who has an interest in or 
fiduciary responsibility for the assets of any retirement system.